Hawaii statutes.
§660-18 Contents. The person making
the return shall state therein, in writing, plainly and unequivocally:

(1) Whether he has or has not the person designated
in his custody or power, or in any manner under his restraint or control;

(2) If he has the person in his custody or power, or
under his restraint or control, the authority, and the time, and whole cause of
such imprisonment or restraint, with a copy of any process or warrant under
which the person is detained;

(3) If he has had the person in his custody or power,
or under his restraint or control, and has transferred such custody, restraint,
or control to another, or if he has any knowledge or suspicion that any other
person exercises or claims to exercise such custody, power, restraint, or control,
all that he knows or suspects.

No return shall be adjudged sufficient when the
respondent has once held the person in his custody or power, or under his
restraint or control, unless it states fully all that the respondent knows or
suspects, or alleges unequivocally that he neither knows nor suspects, nor has
any cause to suspect anything as to the custody or restraint of the person
alleged to be detained, up to the time of making the return. [L 1870, c 32,
§13; RL 1925, §2741; RL 1935, §4326; RL 1945, §10367; RL 1955, §239-18; HRS
§660-18; am L 1972, c 90, §5(1)]

Case Notes

Sufficiency of return. 31 H. 212 (1929).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next